North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 3. Department of State Auditor.

§ 143A-24.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of State Auditor. The head of the Department of the State Auditor is the State Auditor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 5.

§ 143A-25.
State Auditor; powers and duties.

The State Auditor shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 5.

§ 143A-26.
State Auditor; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or by this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions of the State Auditor are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of the State Auditor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 5.

§ 143A-27.
North Carolina Firemen’s Pension Fund; transfer.

The North Carolina Firemen’s Pension Fund, as contained in Article 3 of Chapter 118 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Auditor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 5.

§ 143A-27.1.
North Carolina Firemen’s and Rescue Squad Workers’ Pension Fund; transfer.

The “North Carolina Firemen’s and Rescue Squad Workers’ Pension Fund”, as contained in Article 3 of Chapter 118 of the General Statutes is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Auditor.

History.

1981, c. 1029, s. 3.

§ 143A-28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1204, s. 2.

§ 143A-29.
State Board of Pensions; transfer.

The State Board of Pensions, as contained in Article 2 of Chapter 112 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Auditor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 5.